District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

42-3925

Judicial review of Board action.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 7, 1991, D.C. Law 8-219, § 26, 38 DCR 171
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1242, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-3225.